Alaska, session 34, HB183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.17.500(d) is amended to read: 05 (d) Except as provided in (e) [(e) - (g)] of this section, a student in a district- 06 wide early education program provided by a school district and approved by the 07 department under AS 14.07.020(a)(8) is counted as [ONE-HALF OF] a full-time 08 equivalent student. 09 * Sec. 2. Section 47, ch. 40, SLA 2022, is amended to read: 10 Sec. 47. AS 14.03.120(h), 14.03.410, 14.03.420; AS 14.17.500(e), 11 [14.17.500(f),] 14.17.500(g); AS 14.20.020(l); AS 14.30.760, 14.30.765, 14.30.770, 12 14.30.775, 14.30.780, and 14.30.800 are repealed. 13 * Sec. 3. AS 14.17.500(f) is repealed. 14 * Sec. 4. This Act takes effect July 1, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.